Utah statutes.
59-2-107.   Classes of personal property -- Rulemaking authority.
The commission shall make rules:
(1)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act;
(2)  defining classes of items considered to be personal property for purposes
of this chapter;
(3)  defining items that fall into the classes established under Subsection
(2); and
(4)  defining any class or item as personal property if the commission defined
that class or item as personal property prior to January 1, 2004, by:
(a)  a rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act;
(b)  a published decision of the commission; or
(c)  an official schedule published by the commission.
